North Carolina, session 2025, SB345.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 90-1.1 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(4d) Team-based setting or team-based practice. – Any of the following:
a. A medical practice that meets all of the following requirements:
1. The majority of the practice is owned collectively by one or
more licensed physicians.
2. An owner who is a physician licensed under this Chapter has
consistent and meaningful participation in the design and
implementation of health services to patients, as defined by
rules adopted by the Board.
3. The physicians and team-based physician assistants who
provide services at the medical practice work in the same
clinical practice area.
b. Hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, and other health facilities with
active credentialing and quality programs where physicians have
consistent and meaningful participation in the design and
implementation of health services to patients, as defined by rules
adopted by the Board.
c. For the purposes of this Article, the term "team-based setting" or
"team-based practice" shall not include a medical practice that
specializes in pain management."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 90-9.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-9.3. Requirements for licensure as a physician assistant.
(a) To be eligible for licensure as a physician assistant, an applicant shall submit proof
satisfactory to the Board that the applicant has met all of the following:
(1) The applicant has successfully completed an educational program for
physician assistants or surgeon assistants accredited by the Accreditation
Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant or its
predecessor or successor entities.
(2) The applicant has a current or previous certification issued by the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants or its successor.
*S345-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The applicant is of good moral character.
(b) Before initiating practice of medical acts, tasks, or functions as a physician assistant,
the physician assistant shall provide the Board the name, address, and telephone number of the
physician who will supervise the physician assistant in the relevant medical setting. This
subsection shall not apply to physician assistants who meet the requirements for team-based
practice under G.S. 90-9.3A.
(c) The Board may, by rule, require an applicant to comply with other requirements or
submit additional information the Board deems appropriate."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-9.3A. Requirements for team-based practice as a physician assistant.
(a) In order to practice as a team-based physician assistant, a physician assistant shall
meet all of the following conditions:
(1) Practice in team-based settings, as defined in G.S. 90-1.1(4d).
(2) Have more than 4,000 hours of clinical practice experience as a licensed
physician assistant and more than 1,000 hours of clinical practice experience
within the specific medical specialty of practice with a physician in that
specialty.
(3) Submit proof as the Board may deem satisfactory by rule that the individual
meets the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection. The
Board may, by rule, require the physician assistant to comply with other
requirements or submit additional information the Board deems appropriate.
(b) Team-based physician assistants shall collaborate and consult with or refer to the
appropriate members of the health care team as required by the patient's condition and as
indicated by the education, experience, and competencies of the physician assistant and the
standard of care. The degree of collaboration must be determined by the practice which may
include decisions by the employer, group, hospital service, and the credentialing and privileging
systems of a licensed facility. The Board may adopt rules to establish requirements for the
determination and enforcement of collaboration, consultation, and referral. Team-based
physician assistants are responsible for the care they provide.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, a team-based physician assistant
practicing in a perioperative setting, including the provision of surgical or anesthesia-related
services, shall be supervised by a physician."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 90-12.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-12.4. Physician assistant limited volunteer license.
…
(d) Before initiating the performance of medical acts, tasks, or functions as a physician
assistant licensed under this section, the physician assistant shall provide submit to the Board
either an "Intent to Practice Notification Form," which shall include the name, address, and
telephone number of the physician licensed under this Article who will supervise the physician
assistant in the clinic specializing in the care of indigent patients.patients, or meet the
requirements for team-based practice under G.S. 90-9.3A.
…."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 90-12.4B reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-12.4B. Physician Assistant assistant retired limited volunteer license.
…."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 90-18.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-18.1. Limitations on physician assistants.
(a) Any person who is licensed under the provisions of G.S. 90-9.3 to perform medical
acts, tasks, and functions as a physician assistant may use the title "physician assistant" or "PA."
Page 2 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Any other person who uses the title in any form or holds out to be a physician assistant or to be
so licensed, shall be deemed to be in violation of this Article.
(a1) Physician assistants shall clearly designate their credentials as a physician assistant in
all clinical settings.
(b) Physician assistants are authorized to write prescriptions for drugs under the
following conditions:
(1) The North Carolina Medical Board has adopted regulations governing the
approval of individual physician assistants to write prescriptions with such
limitations as the Board may determine to be in the best interest of patient
health and safety.
(2) The physician assistant holds a current license issued by the Board.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2019-191, s. 35, effective October 1, 2019.
(4) The supervising physician has provided to the physician assistant written
instructions about indications and contraindications for prescribing drugs and
a written policy for periodic review by the physician of the drugs prescribed.
This subdivision shall not apply to individuals who are practicing in a
team-based setting under G.S. 90-9.3A.
(5) A physician assistant shall personally consult with the supervising physician
prior to prescribing a targeted controlled substance as defined in Article 5 of
this Chapter when all of the following conditions apply:
a. The patient is being treated by a facility that primarily engages in the
treatment of pain by prescribing narcotic medications.
b. The therapeutic use of the targeted controlled substance will or is
expected to exceed a period of 30 days.
When a targeted controlled substance prescribed in accordance with this subdivision is
continuously prescribed to the same patient, the physician assistant shall consult with the
supervising physician at least once every 90 days to verify that the prescription remains medically
appropriate for the patient.
(c) Physician assistants are authorized to compound and dispense drugs under the
following conditions:
(1) The function is performed under the supervision of a licensed
pharmacist.physician.
(2) Rules and regulations of the North Carolina Board of Pharmacy and all
applicable State and federal laws governing this function compounding and
dispensing are complied with.
(3) The physician assistant holds a current license issued by the Board.
(4) The physician assistant registers with the Board of Pharmacy.
(d) Physician assistants are authorized to order medications, tests and treatments in
hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, and other health facilities under the following conditions:
(1) The North Carolina Medical Board has adopted regulations governing the
approval of individual physician assistants to order medications, tests, and
treatments with such limitations as the Board may determine to be in the best
interest of patient health and safety.
(2) The physician assistant holds a current license issued by the Board.
(3) The If the physician assistant is subject to a supervisory arrangement, the
supervising physician has provided to the physician assistant written
instructions about ordering medications, tests, and treatments, and when
appropriate, specific oral or written instructions for an individual patient, with
provision for review by the physician of the order within a reasonable time, as
determined by the Board, after the medication, test, or treatment is ordered.
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The hospital or other health facility has adopted a written policy about
ordering medications, tests, and treatments, including procedures for
verification of the physician assistants' orders by nurses and other facility
employees and such other procedures as are in the interest of patient health
and safety.
(e) Any prescription written by a physician assistant or order given by a physician
assistant for medications, tests, or treatments shall be deemed to have been authorized by the
physician approved by the Board as the supervisor of the physician assistant and the supervising
physician shall be responsible for authorizing the prescription or order. This subsection shall not
apply to individuals who are practicing in a team-based setting under G.S. 90-9.3A who may
prescribe, order, administer, and procure drugs and medical devices without physician
authorization. Individuals who are practicing in a team-based setting under G.S. 90-9.3A may
also plan and initiate a therapeutic regimen that includes ordering and prescribing
non-pharmacological interventions, including durable medical equipment, nutrition, blood, blood
products, and diagnostic support services, including home health care, hospice, and physical and
occupational therapy.
(e1) Any medical certification completed by a physician assistant for a Physician assistants
may authenticate any document, including death certificate shall be deemed to have been
authorized by the physician approved by the Board as the supervisor of the physician assistant,
and the supervising physician shall be responsible for authorizing the completion certificates with
their signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or endorsement, if it may be so
authenticated by the signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or endorsement of the
medical certification.a physician.
(e2) Physician assistants shall not perform final interpretations of diagnostic imaging
studies. For purposes of this subsection, "diagnostic imaging" shall include computed
tomography (CT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), nuclear medicine, positron emission
tomography (PET), mammography, and ultrasound services. Final interpretation shall be
provided by a physician licensed under this Chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
Chapter, physician assistants conducting final interpretation of plain film radiographs shall be
supervised by a physician.
…
(g) Any person who is licensed under G.S. 90-9.3 to perform medical acts, tasks, and
functions as a physician assistant shall comply with each of the following:
(1) Maintain a current and active license to practice in this State.
(2) Maintain an active registration with the Board.
(3) Have File a current Intent to Practice form filed with the Board.Board or meet
the requirements for team-based practice under G.S. 90-9.3A.
…."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 90-21.81(9) reads as rewritten:
"(9) Qualified technician. – A registered diagnostic medical sonographer who is
certified in obstetrics and gynecology by the American Registry for
Diagnostic Medical Sonography (ARDMS) (ARDMS), a physician assistant
with certification in obstetrical ultrasonography, or a nurse midwife or
advanced practice nurse practitioner in obstetrics with certification in
obstetrical ultrasonography."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 58-3-169 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-3-169. Required coverage for minimum hospital stay following birth.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section:
(1) "Attending providers" includes:
Page 4 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The obstetrician-gynecologists, pediatricians, family physicians, and
other physicians primarily responsible for the care of a mother and
newborn; and
b. The nurse midwives midwives, physician assistants, and nurse
practitioners primarily responsible for the care of a mother and her
newborn child in accordance with State licensure and certification
laws.
…."
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 110-91 reads as rewritten:
"§ 110-91. Mandatory standards for a license.
All child care facilities shall comply with all State laws and federal laws and local ordinances
that pertain to child health, safety, and welfare. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the
standards in this section shall be complied with by all child care facilities. However, none of the
standards in this section apply to the school-age children of the operator of a child care facility
but do apply to the preschool-age children of the operator. Children 13 years of age or older may
receive child care on a voluntary basis provided all applicable required standards are met. The
standards in this section, along with any other applicable State laws and federal laws or local
ordinances, shall be the required standards for the issuance of a license by the Secretary under
the policies and procedures of the Commission except that the Commission may, in its discretion,
adopt less stringent standards for the licensing of facilities which provide care on a temporary,
part-time, drop-in, seasonal, after-school or other than a full-time basis.
(1) Medical Care and Sanitation. – The Commission for Public Health shall adopt
rules which establish minimum sanitation standards for child care centers and
their personnel. The sanitation rules adopted by the Commission for Public
Health shall cover such matters as the cleanliness of floors, walls, ceilings,
storage spaces, utensils, and other facilities; adequacy of ventilation;
sanitation of water supply, lavatory facilities, toilet facilities, sewage disposal,
food protection facilities, bactericidal treatment of eating and drinking
utensils, and solid-waste storage and disposal; methods of food preparation
and serving; infectious disease control; sleeping facilities; and other items and
facilities as are necessary in the interest of the public health. The Commission
for Public Health shall allow child care centers to use domestic kitchen
equipment, provided appropriate temperature levels for heating, cooling, and
storing are maintained. Child care centers that fry foods shall use commercial
hoods. These rules shall be developed in consultation with the Department.
The Commission shall adopt rules for child care facilities to establish
minimum requirements for child and staff health assessments and medical
care procedures. These rules shall be developed in consultation with the
Department. Each child shall have a health assessment before being admitted
or within 30 days following admission to a child care facility. The assessment
shall be done by: (i) a licensed physician, (ii) the physician's authorized agent
who is currently approved by the North Carolina Medical Board, or
comparable certifying board in any state contiguous to North Carolina, (iii) a
certified nurse practitioner, (iv) a licensed physician assistant, or (iv) (v) a
public health nurse meeting the Departments Standards for Early Periodic
Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment Program. However, no health
assessment shall be required of any staff or child who is and has been in
normal health when the staff, or the child's parent, guardian, or full-time
custodian objects in writing to a health assessment on religious grounds which
conform to the teachings and practice of any recognized church or religious
denomination.
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Organizations that provide prepared meals to child care centers only are
considered child care centers for purposes of compliance with appropriate
sanitation standards.
…."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina Medical Board shall adopt permanent rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 90-8.2(a) is repealed.
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 90-18(c) reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-18. Practicing without license; penalties.
(c) The following shall not constitute practicing medicine or surgery as defined in this
Article:
…
(14) The practice of nursing by a registered nurse engaged in the practice of nursing
and the performance of acts otherwise constituting medical practice by a
registered nurse when performed in accordance with rules and regulations
developed by a joint subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical Board and
the the North Carolina Board of Nursing and adopted by both boards.Nursing.
…."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 90-18.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-18.2. Limitations on nurse practitioners.
(a) Any nurse approved under the provisions of G.S. 90-18(c)(14) to perform medical
acts, tasks or functions may use the title "nurse practitioner." Any other person who uses the title
in any form or holds out to be a nurse practitioner or to be so approved, shall be deemed to be in
violation of this Article.
(b) Nurse practitioners are authorized to write prescriptions for drugs under all of the
following conditions:
(1) The North Carolina Medical Board and Board of Nursing have has adopted
regulations developed by a joint subcommittee governing the approval of
individual nurse practitioners to write prescriptions with such limitations as
the boards North Carolina Board of Nursing may determine to be in the best
interest of patient health and safety.
(2) The nurse practitioner has current approval from the boards.North Carolina
Board of Nursing.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2019-191, s. 36, effective October 1, 2019.
(4) The supervising physician has provided to the nurse practitioner written
instructions about indications and contraindications for prescribing drugs and
a written policy for periodic review by the physician of the drugs prescribed.
(5) A nurse practitioner shall personally consult with the supervising physician
prior to prescribing a targeted controlled substance as defined in Article 5 of
this Chapter when all of the following conditions apply:
a. The patient is being treated by a facility that primarily engages in the
treatment of pain by prescribing narcotic medications.
b. The therapeutic use of the targeted controlled substance will or is
expected to exceed a period of 30 days.
When a targeted controlled substance prescribed in accordance with this
subdivision is continuously prescribed to the same patient, the nurse
practitioner shall consult with the supervising physician at least once every 90
days to verify that the prescription remains medically appropriate for the
patient.
(c) Nurse practitioners are authorized to compound and dispense drugs under the
following conditions:
Page 6 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The function is performed under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist; and
(2) Rules and regulations of the North Carolina Board of Pharmacy governing
this function are complied with.
(d) Nurse practitioners are authorized to order medications, tests and treatments in
hospitals, clinics, nursing homes and other health facilities under all of the following conditions:
(1) The North Carolina Medical Board and Board of Nursing have has adopted
regulations developed by a joint subcommittee governing the approval of
individual nurse practitioners to order medications, tests and treatments with
such limitations as the boards may determine to be in the best interest of
patient health and safety.
(2) The nurse practitioner has current approval from the boards.North Carolina
Board of Nursing.
(3) The supervising physician has provided to the nurse practitioner written
instructions about ordering medications, tests and treatments, and when
appropriate, specific oral or written instructions for an individual patient, with
provision for review by the physician of the order within a reasonable time, as
determined by the Board, North Carolina Board of Nursing, after the
medication, test or treatment is ordered.
(4) The hospital or other health facility has adopted a written policy, approved by
the medical staff after consultation with the nursing administration, about
ordering medications, tests and treatments, including procedures for
verification of the nurse practitioners' orders by nurses and other facility
employees and such other procedures as are in the interest of patient health
and safety.
(e) Any prescription written by a nurse practitioner or order given by a nurse practitioner
for medications, tests or treatments shall be deemed to have been authorized by the physician
approved by the boards North Carolina Board of Nursing as the supervisor of the nurse
practitioner and such supervising physician shall be responsible for authorizing such prescription
or order.
(e1) Any medical certification completed by a nurse practitioner for a death certificate
shall be deemed to have been authorized by the physician approved by the boards as the
supervisor of the nurse practitioner, and the supervising physician shall be responsible for
authorizing the completion of the medical certification.
(f) Any registered nurse or licensed practical nurse who receives an order from a nurse
practitioner for medications, tests or treatments is authorized to perform that order in the same
manner as if it were received from a licensed physician."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 90-171.23(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Duties, powers. The Board is empowered to:
…
(14) Appoint and maintain a subcommittee of the Board to work jointly with the
subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical Board to develop rules and
regulations to govern the performance of medical acts by registered nurses
and to determine reasonable fees to accompany an application for approval or
renewal of such approval as provided in G.S. 90-8.2. The fees and rules
developed by this subcommittee shall govern the performance of medical acts
by registered nurses and shall become effective when they have been adopted
by both Boards.Grant prescribing, ordering, dispensing, and furnishing
authority to nurse practitioners pursuant to G.S. 90-18.2. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the Board shall have the sole authority to adopt rules
and enforce regulations governing the practice and conduct of nurse
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
practitioners as defined in G.S. 90-18.2 and certified nurse midwives and the
practice of midwifery as defined in G.S. 90-178.2.
…
(25) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of Article
10A of this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 90-171.37(b) is repealed.
SECTION 3.(f) G.S. 90-18.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-18.8. Limitations on nurse-midwives.
(a) Any Certified Nurse Midwife approved under the provisions of Article 10A of this
Chapter to provide midwifery care may use the title "Certified Nurse Midwife." Any other person
who uses the title in any form or holds himself or herself out to be a Certified Nurse Midwife or
to be so approved shall be deemed to be in violation of this Article.
(b) A Certified Nurse Midwife is authorized to write prescriptions for drugs if all of the
following conditions are met:
(1) The Certified Nurse Midwife has current approval from the joint
subcommittee established under North Carolina Board of Nursing pursuant to
G.S. 90-178.4.
(2) The joint subcommittee as established under G.S. 90-178.4 North Carolina
Board of Nursing has assigned an identification number to the Certified Nurse
Midwife that appears on the written prescription.
(3) The joint subcommittee as established under G.S. 90-178.4 North Carolina
Board of Nursing has provided to the Certified Nurse Midwife written
instructions about indications and contraindications for prescribing drugs and
a written policy for periodic review of the drugs prescribed.
(c) The joint subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical Board and the Board of
Nursing, established under North Carolina Board of Nursing, pursuant to G.S. 90-178.4, shall
adopt rules governing the approval of individual Certified Nurse Midwives to write prescriptions
with any limitations the joint subcommittee Board deems are in the best interest of patient health
and safety, consistent with the rules established for nurse practitioners under G.S. 90-18.2(b)(1)."
SECTION 3.(g) G.S. 90-178.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-178.3. Regulation of midwifery.
…
(b1) A Certified Nurse Midwife with less than 24 months and 4,000 hours of practice as a
Certified Nurse Midwife shall (i) have a collaborative provider agreement with a collaborating
provider and (ii) maintain signed and dated copies of the collaborative provider agreement as
required by practice guidelines and any rules adopted by the joint subcommittee of the North
Carolina Medical Board and the Board of Nursing. If a collaborative provider agreement is
terminated before the Certified Nurse Midwife acquires the level of experience required for
practice without a collaborative provider agreement under this Article, the Certified Nurse
Midwife shall have 90 days from the date the agreement is terminated to enter into a collaborative
provider agreement with a new collaborating provider. During the 90-day period, the Certified
Nurse Midwife may continue to practice midwifery as defined under this Article.
(c) Graduate nurse midwife applicant status may be granted by the joint subcommittee
North Carolina Board of Nursing in accordance with G.S. 90-178.4."
SECTION 3.(h) G.S. 90-178.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-178.4. Administration.
(a) The joint subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical Board and the Board of
Nursing created pursuant to G.S. 90-18.2 shall administer the provisions of this Article and the
rules adopted pursuant to this Article; Provided, however, that actions of the joint subcommittee
pursuant to this Article shall not require approval by the North Carolina Medical Board and the
Board of Nursing. For purposes of this Article, the joint subcommittee shall be enlarged by four
Page 8 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
additional members, including two certified midwives and two obstetricians who have had
working experience with midwives.Article.
(a1) Any Certified Nurse Midwife who attends a planned birth outside of a hospital setting
shall discuss with the patient the associated risks and obtain a signed informed consent agreement
from the Certified Nurse Midwife's patient that shall include:
(1) Information about the risks associated with a planned birth outside of the
hospital.
(2) A clear assumption of those risks by the patient.
(3) An agreement by the patient to consent to transfer to a health care facility
when and if deemed necessary by the Certified Nurse Midwife.
(4) If the Certified Nurse Midwife is not covered under a policy of liability
insurance, a clear disclosure to that effect.
(5) The joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing shall develop the
contents of an informed consent agreement form to be used by a Certified
Nurse Midwife when obtaining informed consent.
(a2) Any Certified Nurse Midwife who attends a planned birth outside of a hospital setting
shall provide to each patient a detailed, written plan for emergent and nonemergent transfer,
which shall include:
(1) The name of and distance to the nearest health care facility licensed under
Chapter 122C or Chapter 131E of the General Statutes that has at least one
operating room.
(2) The procedures for transfer, including modes of transportation and methods
for notifying the relevant health care facility of impending transfer.
(3) An affirmation that the relevant health care facility has been notified of the
plan for emergent and nonemergent transfer by the Certified Nurse Midwife.
(a3) Planned home births attended by a Certified Nurse Midwife shall be limited to
low-risk pregnancies. Pregnancies deemed inadvisable for home births by the American College
of Obstetricians and Gynecologists Committee on Obstetric Practice shall be prohibited. The
joint subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical Board and the Board of Nursing created under
G.S. 90-18.2, including the four additional members required by subsection (a) of this section,
shall adopt rules governing the safety of home births attended by a Certified Nurse Midwife.
(b) The joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing shall adopt rules under this
Article to establish each of the following:
(1) A fee which shall cover application and initial approval up to a maximum of
one hundred dollars ($100.00).
(2) An annual renewal fee to be paid by January 1 of each year by persons
approved under this Article up to a maximum of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(3) A reinstatement fee for a lapsed approval up to a maximum of five dollars
($5.00).
(4) The form and contents of the applications which shall include information
related to the applicant's education and certification by the American
Midwifery Certification Board.
(5) The procedure for establishing collaborative provider agreements as required
by this Article.
(c) The joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing may solicit, employ, or
contract for technical assistance and clerical assistance and may purchase or contract for the
materials and services it needs.
(d) All fees collected on behalf of the joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of
Nursing, pursuant to this section, and all receipts of every kind and nature, as well as the
compensation paid the members of the joint subcommittee and the necessary expenses incurred
by them in the performance of the duties imposed upon them, shall be reported annually to the
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Treasurer. All fees and other moneys received by the joint subcommittee North Carolina
Board of Nursing pursuant to the provisions of the General Statutes this Article shall be kept in
a separate fund by the joint subcommittee, Board, to be held and expended only for such purposes
as are proper and necessary to the discharge of the duties of the joint subcommittee Board under
this Article and to enforce the provisions of this Article. No expense incurred by the joint
subcommittee Board pursuant to this Article shall be charged against the State.
(e) Members of the joint subcommittee who are not officers or employees of the State
shall receive compensation and reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rates
specified in G.S. 138-5. Members of the joint subcommittee who are officers or employees of
the State shall receive reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rate set out in
G.S. 138-6.
(f) The joint subcommittee Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
North Carolina Board of Nursing shall have the sole authority to adopt, amend, and repeal rules
necessary to administer the provisions of this Article.Article and to enforce regulations governing
the practice and conduct of nurse midwives."
SECTION 3.(i) G.S. 90-178.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-178.5. Qualifications for approval; independent practice.
(a) In order to be approved by the joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing
under this Article, a person shall comply with each of the following:
(1) Complete an application on a form furnished by the joint
subcommittee.Board.
(2) Submit evidence of certification by the American Midwifery Certification
Board or its successor.
(3) Submit evidence of a collaborative provider agreement as required by
G.S. 90-178.3(b1).
(4) Pay the fee for application and approval.
(b) Upon submitting to the joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing evidence
of completing 24 months and 4,000 hours of practice as a Certified Nurse Midwife pursuant to a
collaborative provider agreement, a Certified Nurse Midwife is authorized to practice midwifery
independently in accordance with this Article."
SECTION 3.(j) G.S. 90-178.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-178.6. Denial, revocation or suspension of approval.
(a) In accordance with the provisions of Chapter 150B, the joint subcommittee North
Carolina Board of Nursing may deny, revoke or suspend approval when a person has:
(1) Failed to satisfy the qualifications for approval;approval.
(2) Failed to pay the annual renewal fee by January 1 of the current year;year.
(3) Given false information or withheld material information in applying for
approval;approval.
(4) Demonstrated incompetence in the practice of midwifery;midwifery.
(5) Violated any of the provisions of this Article;Article.
(6) A mental or physical disability or uses any drug to a degree that interferes with
his or her fitness to practice midwifery;midwifery.
(7) Engaged in conduct that endangers the public health;health.
(8) Engaged in conduct that deceives, defrauds, or harms the public in the course
of professional activities or services; orservices.
(9) Been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony under
the laws of the United States or of any state of the United States indicating
professional unfitness.
(b) Revocation or suspension of a license to practice nursing pursuant to G.S. 90-171.37
shall automatically result in comparable action against the person's approval to practice
midwifery under this Article."
Page 10 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(k) G.S. 90-178.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-178.7. Enforcement.
(a) The joint subcommittee North Carolina Board of Nursing may apply to the Superior
Court of Wake County to restrain any violation of this Article.
(b) No person shall perform any act constituting the practice of midwifery, as defined in
this Article, or any of the branches thereof, unless the person shall have been first approved under
this Article. Any person who practices midwifery without being duly approved and registered,
as provided in this Article, shall not be allowed to maintain any action to collect any fee for such
services. Any person so practicing without being duly approved shall be guilty of a Class 3
misdemeanor. Any person so practicing without being duly approved under this Article and who
is falsely representing himself or herself in a manner as being approved under this Article or any
Article of this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class I felony."
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 90-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-2. Medical Board.
(a) There is established the North Carolina Medical Board to regulate the practice of
medicine and surgery for the benefit and protection of the people of North Carolina. The Board
shall consist of 13 members:
(1) Six of the members shall be duly licensed physicians recommended by the
Review Panel and appointed by the Governor as set forth in G.S. 90-3.
(2) Five members shall all be appointed by the Governor as follows:
a. One shall be a member of The Old North State Medical Society. This
Board position shall be subject to recommendations of the Review
Panel pursuant to G.S. 90-3.
b. One shall be a public member, and this Board position shall not be
subject to recommendation of the Review Panel pursuant to G.S. 90-3.
c. One Two shall be a physician assistant assistants as defined in
G.S. 90-18.1 as recommended by the Review Panel pursuant to
G.S. 90-3.
d. One shall be a nurse practitioner as defined in G.S. 90-18.2 as
recommended by the Review Panel pursuant to G.S. 90-3.
e. One shall be a duly licensed physician who is a doctor of osteopathic
medicine or a full-time faculty member of one of the medical schools
in North Carolina who utilizes integrative medicine in that person's
clinical practice, as recommended by the Review Panel pursuant to
G.S. 90-3.
(3) Two public members appointed by the General Assembly in accordance with
G.S. 120-121, one upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and one upon the recommendation of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate.
(a1) Each appointing and nominating authority shall endeavor to see, insofar as possible,
that its appointees and nominees to the Board reflect the composition of the State with regard to
gender, ethnic, racial, and age composition.
(b) No member shall serve more than two complete three-year terms in a lifetime, except
that each member shall serve until a successor is chosen and qualifies.
(b1) A public member appointed pursuant to sub-subdivision (a)(2)b. and subdivision
(a)(3) of this section shall not be a health care provider nor the spouse of a health care provider.
For the purpose of Board membership, "health care provider" means any licensed health care
professional, agent, or employee of a health care institution, health care insurer, health care
professional school, or a member of any allied health profession. For purposes of this section, a
person enrolled in a program as preparation to be a licensed health care professional or an allied
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
health professional shall be deemed a health care provider. For purposes of this section, any
person with significant financial interest in a health service or profession is not a public member.
(c) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-366, s. 1, effective October 1, 2003.
(d) Any member of the Board may be removed from office by the Governor for good
cause shown. Any vacancy in the physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner physician
or physician assistant membership of the Board shall be filled for the period of the unexpired
term by the Governor from a list submitted by the Review Panel pursuant to G.S. 90-3. Any
vacancy in the public membership of the Board shall be filled by the appropriate appointing
authority for the unexpired term.
(e) The North Carolina Medical Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent,
encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as any private
person or corporation, subject only to approval of the Governor and the Council of State as to the
acquisition, rental, encumbering, leasing, and sale of real property. Collateral pledged by the
Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 90-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-3. Review Panel recommends certain Board members; criteria for recommendations.
(a) There is created a Review Panel to review all applicants for the physician positions,
the physician assistant position, and the nurse practitioner position and physician assistant
positions on the Board. The Review Panel shall consist of nine members, including four from the
Medical Society, one from the Old North State Medical Society, one from the North Carolina
Osteopathic Medical Association, one two from the North Carolina Academy of Physician
Assistants, one from the North Carolina Nurses Association Council of Nurse Practitioners, and
one public member currently serving or who has served on the Board. Each member shall serve
for a term of three years, ending December 31 of the last year of the term. No member shall serve
more than two terms. All physicians, physician assistants, and nurse practitioners physicians and
physician assistants serving on the Review Panel shall be actively practicing in North Carolina.
The Review Panel shall contract for the independent administrative services needed to
complete its functions and duties. The Board shall provide funds to pay the reasonable cost for
the administrative services of the Review Panel. The Board shall convene the initial meeting of
the Review Panel. The Review Panel shall elect a chair, and all subsequent meetings shall be
convened by the Review Panel.
The Governor shall appoint Board members as provided in G.S. 90-2. The Review Panel shall
attempt to make its recommendations to the Governor reflect the composition of the State with
regard to gender, ethnic, racial, medical specialty, and age.
The Review Panel and its members and staff shall not be held liable in any civil or criminal
proceeding for exercising, in good faith, the powers and duties authorized by law.
(b) To be considered qualified for a physician position, the physician assistant position,
or nurse practitioner or physician assistant position on the Board, an applicant shall meet each of
the following criteria:
(1) Hold an active, nonlimited license to practice medicine in North Carolina, or
in the case of a physician assistant and nurse practitioner, assistant, hold an
active license or approval to perform medical acts, tasks, and functions in
North Carolina.
(2) Have an active clinical or teaching practice. For purposes of this subdivision,
the term "active" means patient care, or instruction of students in an accredited
medical school or residency, or clinical research program, for 20 hours or
more per week.
(3) Have actively practiced in this State for at least five consecutive years
immediately preceding the appointment.
(4) Intend to remain in active practice in this State for the duration of the term on
the Board.
Page 12 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Submit at least three letters of recommendation, either from individuals or
from professional or other societies or organizations.
(6) Have no public disciplinary history with the Board or any other licensing
board in this State or another state over the past 10 years before applying for
appointment to the Board.
(7) Have no history of felony convictions of any kind.
(8) Have no misdemeanor convictions related to the practice of medicine.
(9) Indicate, in a manner prescribed by the Review Panel, that the applicant: (i)
understands that the primary purpose of the Board is to protect the public; (ii)
is willing to take appropriate disciplinary action against his or her peers for
misconduct or violations of the standards of medical care; and (iii) is aware of
the time commitment needed to be a constructive member of the Board.
(10) Have not served more than 72 months as a member of the Board.
(c) The Review Panel shall recommend at least two qualified nominees for each open
position on the Board. If the Governor chooses not to appoint either of the recommended
nominees, the Review Panel shall recommend at least two new qualified nominees.
(d) Notice of open physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner physician or
physician assistant positions on the Board shall be sent to all physicians currently licensed to
practice medicine in North Carolina and all physician assistants and nurse practitioners currently
licensed or approved to perform medical acts, tasks, and functions in this State.
(e) Applicants for positions on the Board shall not be required to be members of any
professional association or society, except as provided in G.S. 90-2(a)(2)a.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of G.S. 90-16, the Board may provide confidential and
nonpublic licensing and investigative information in its possession to the Review Panel regarding
applicants.
(g) All applications, records, papers, files, reports, and all investigative and licensing
information received by the Review Panel from the Board and other documents received or
gathered by the Review Panel, its members, employees, agents, and consultants as a result of
soliciting, receiving, and reviewing applications and making recommendations as required in this
section shall not be considered public records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes. All such information shall be privileged, confidential, and not subject to discovery,
subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion for release to any person other than the Review
Panel, the Board, and their employees, agents, or consultants, except as provided in this section.
The Review Panel shall publish on its Internet Web site the names and practice addresses of all
applicants within 10 days after the application deadline. The Review Panel shall publish on its
Internet Web site the names and practice addresses of the nominees recommended to the
Governor within 10 days after notifying the Governor of those recommendations and not less
than 30 days prior to the expiration of the open position on the Board.
(h) The Review Panel is a public body within the meaning of Article 33C of Chapter 143
of the General Statutes. In addition to the provisions contained in Article 33C of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes permitting a public body to conduct business in a closed session, the Review
Panel shall meet in closed session to review applications; interview applicants; review and
discuss information received from the Board; and discuss, debate, and vote on recommendations
to the Governor."
SECTION 5. The North Carolina Board of Nursing shall adopt rules to implement
the provisions of Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of this act becomes effective when the North Carolina
Medical Board adopts the permanent rules required under Section 2 of this act or June 30, 2026,
whichever occurs first. The North Carolina Medical Board shall notify the Revisor of Statutes
when the rules required under Section 2 of this act have been adopted. Section 3 of this act
becomes effective when the North Carolina Board of Nursing adopts the permanent rules
Senate Bill 345-Second Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
required under Section 5 of this act or June 30, 2026, whichever occurs first. The North Carolina
Board of Nursing shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when the rules required under Section 5 of
this act have been adopted. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 14 Senate Bill 345-Second Edition